District of Columbia statutes.
48-903.08

Prescriptions.

(a)

Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user, no controlled substance in Schedule II may be dispensed without the written prescription of a practitioner.

(b)

In emergency situations, as defined by rule of the Mayor, Schedule II drugs may be dispensed upon oral prescription of a practitioner, reduced promptly to writing and filed by the pharmacy. Prescriptions shall be retained in conformity with the requirements of § 48-903.06. No prescription for a Schedule II controlled substance may be refilled.

(c)

Except when dispensed directly by a practitioner, other than a pharmacy, to an ultimate user, a controlled substance included in Schedule III or IV which is a prescription drug as determined under § 353(b) of Title 21, United States Code, shall not be dispensed without a written or oral prescription of a practitioner. The prescription shall not be filled or refilled more than 6 months after the date thereof or be refilled more than 5 times, unless renewed by the practitioner.

(d)

A controlled substance included in Schedule V shall not be distributed or dispensed other than for a medical purpose.

(e)

Whenever a practitioner dispenses any controlled substance on a written or oral prescription issued by a practitioner, the practitioner shall affix to the container in which such controlled substance is dispensed a label showing the name of the controlled substance or controlled substances contained therein unless otherwise so indicated by the prescribing practitioner; the serial number and date of initial filling; the directions for use; the practitioner’s name and registry number; the name of the ultimate user, or if the ultimate user is an animal, the name of the owner and the species of the animal; the name of the practitioner issuing the prescription; and caution statements, if any, as required by law.

Aug. 5, 1981, D.C. Law 4-29, title III, § 308, 28 DCR 3081
1981 Ed., § 33-538.
This section is referenced in § 48-904.02.